pt-PT: Sistema de encaixe de quilhas compatível: Dual Tab (compatível com FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Encaixe deslizante; Star Box; US Box; Outro
nl: Compatibel vinbox-systeem: Dual Tab (FCS-compatibel); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Inschuifbaar; Star Box; US Box; Overig
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém uchytenia plutvy: Dual Tab (kompatibilné s FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Zasúvací; Star Box; US Box; Iné
hu: Kompatibilis uszonybefogó rendszer: Dual Tab (FCS-kompatibilis); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Becsúsztatható (Slide-in); Star Box; US Box; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilní systém uchycení ploutví: Dual Tab (kompatibilní s FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Jiné
de: Kompatibles Finnenboxsystem: Dual Tab (FCS-kompatibel); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-In; Star Box; US Box; Sonstige
tr: Uyumlu fin kutusu sistemi: Çift tırnaklı (FCS uyumlu); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Geçmeli; Star Box; US Box; Diğer
fr: Système de boîtier d'aileron compatible: Dual Tab (compatible FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; À glissière; Star Box; US Box; Autre
nb: Kompatibelt finnekassesystem: Dual Tab (FCS-kompatibel); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Annet
ru: Совместимая система крепления плавника: Двойной выступ (совместимо с FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Другое
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem nosilcev plavuti: Dual Tab (združljivo s FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Drugo
sv: Kompatibelt fenlådesystem: Dual Tab (FCS-kompatibel); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Annat
hr-HR: Kompatibilan sustav kutije za peraju: Dvostruki jezičak (kompatibilno s FCS-om); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Ostalo
el: Συμβατό σύστημα κουτιού πτερυγίου: Διπλή γλωττίδα (συμβατό με FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Συρόμενο; Star Box; US Box; Άλλο
en: Compatible fin box system: Dual Tab (FCS compatible); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Other
ja: 対応フィンボックスシステム: デュアルタブ (FCS互換); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; スライドイン; Star Box; US Box; その他
es: Sistema de caja de aletas compatible: Pestaña doble (compatible con FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Deslizable; Star Box; US Box; Otro
pl: Zgodny układ stateczników: Dual Tab (kompatybilny z FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Wsuwany; Star Box; US Box; Inne
fi: Yhteensopiva eväkiinnikejärjestelmä: Dual Tab (FCS-yhteensopiva); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Liu'utettava; Star Box; US Box; Muu
vi: Hệ thống hộp vây tương thích: Tab kép (Tương thích FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Trượt; Star Box; US Box; Khác
ko: 호환 핀 박스 시스템: 듀얼 탭(FCS 호환); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; 파워 박스; 슬라이드 인; 스타 박스; US 박스; 기타
bg-BG: Съвместимост на кутията за плавници: Dual Tab (съвместима с FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Плъзгаща се; Star Box; US Box; Други
th: ระบบกล่องครีบที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: แถบคู่ (รองรับกับ FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; แบบเลื่อนเข้า; Star Box; US Box; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 适用鳍盒系统: Dual Tab（兼容 FCS）; FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; 滑入式; Star Box; US Box; 其他
ro-RO: Sistem de cutie pentru înotătoare compatibil: Tab dublu (compatibil cu FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Altele
da: Kompatibelt finneæskesystem: Dual Tab (FCS-kompatibel); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Andet
it: Sistema del box pinna compatibile: Dual Tab (compatibile FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; A scorrimento; Star Box; US Box; Altro
zh-TW: 相容尾鰭箱系統: 雙凸片 (相容於 FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; 插入式; Star Box; US Box; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinama pelekų dėžutės sistema: „Dual Tab“ (suderinama su FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Įstumiama („Slide-in“); Star Box; US Box; Kita
pt-BR: Sistema de encaixe de quilha compatível: Dual Tab (compatível com FCS); FCS; FCS II; Futures; Lib Tech FOC II; Power Box; Slide-in; Star Box; US Box; Outro